Illinois, session 104th, HB848.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Radon Industry Licensing Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (420 ILCS 44/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Radon 8Industry Licensing Act.9(Source: P.A. 90-262, eff. 7-30-97.)